Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1039.
do enact as follows:AB1039,11Section 1. 939.6192 of the statutes is created to read:AB1039,2,82939.6192 Mandatory minimum sentence for terrorist crimes against 3occupants of a church. (1) If a person is convicted of a felony under chs. 939 to 4951 that is committed with the intent to terrorize, intimidate, or coerce 2 or more 5occupants of a church, the court shall impose a bifurcated sentence under s. 973.01. 6The term of confinement in prison portion of the bifurcated sentence shall be at 7least one year. The court may not put the person on probation. Otherwise the 8penalties for the crime apply, subject to any applicable penalty enhancement.AB1039,2,119(2) This section provides for the enhancement of the penalties applicable for 10the underlying crime. The court shall direct that the trier of fact find a special 11verdict as to all of the issues specified in sub. (1).AB1039,212Section 2. 967.056 of the statutes is created to read:AB1039,3,213967.056 Prosecution of certain crimes. (1) Intent. The legislature 1intends to encourage the vigorous prosecution of persons who commit felonies that 2are subject to the mandatory minimum sentence under s. 939.6192.AB1039,3,113(2) Dismissing or amending charge. Notwithstanding s. 971.29, if a person 4is charged with a felony that may, depending on the finding of the trier of fact, be 5subject to the mandatory minimum sentence under s. 939.6192, a prosecutor may 6not dismiss or amend the charge without the approval of the court. In the 7application to the court, the prosecutor shall state the reasons for the proposed 8amendment or dismissal. The court may approve the application only if the court 9finds that the proposed amendment or dismissal is consistent with the public’s 10interest in deterring the commission of such felonies and consistent with the 11legislature’s intent expressed in sub. (1).AB1039,3,1712(3) No deferred prosecution. A prosecutor may not place a person in a 13deferred prosecution program if a complaint or information is filed that alleges the 14person committed a felony that may, depending on the finding of the trier of fact, be 15subject to the mandatory minimum sentence under s. 939.6192 or if the person is 16charged with a felony that may, depending on the finding of the trier of fact, be 17subject to the mandatory minimum sentence under s. 939.6192.AB1039,318Section 3. 971.38 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1039,4,419971.38 (1) Except as provided in s. 967.055 (3) or 967.056 (3), the district 20attorney may require as a condition of any deferred prosecution program for any 21crime that the defendant perform community service work for a public agency or a 22nonprofit charitable organization. The number of hours of work required may not 23exceed what would be reasonable considering the seriousness of the alleged offense. 1An order may only apply if agreed to by the defendant and the organization or 2agency. The district attorney shall ensure that the defendant is provided a written 3statement of the terms of the community service order and that the community 4service order is monitored.AB1039,45Section 4. 971.39 (1) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1039,4,106971.39 (1) (intro.) Except as provided in s. 967.055 (3) or 967.056 (3), in 7counties having a population of less than 100,000, if a defendant is charged with a 8crime, the district attorney, the department and a defendant may all enter into a 9deferred prosecution agreement which includes, but is not limited to, the following 10conditions:AB1039,511Section 5. Initial applicability.AB1039,4,1312(1) This act first applies to a complaint, information, or charge filed on the 13effective date of this subsection.AB1039,4,1414